Hawaii statutes.
§147-95 Regulation of advertising. The
department of agriculture may regulate advertising in regard to grading,
inspection, and origin of carcasses or parts thereof by slaughterers,
wholesalers, and retailers of beef, pork, or poultry carcasses offered for
sale, regardless of the origin of such carcasses. [L 1955, c 272, §4; RL 1955,
§22-93; ren L 1957, c 172, §1(d); am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§2; HRS §147-95]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next